Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-505
Terms-of-service agreement.

(a) The Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act (2015) does not change or impair a right of a custodian or a user under a terms-of-service agreement to access and use digital assets of the user.

(b) The Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act (2015) does not give a fiduciary or a designated recipient any new or expanded rights other than those held by the user for whom, or for whose estate, the fiduciary or designated recipient acts or represents.

(c) A fiduciary’s or designated recipient's access to digital assets may be modified or eliminated by a user, by federal law, or by a terms-of-service agreement if the user has not provided direction under section 30-504.

Laws 2016, LB829, § 5.